Utah statutes.
54-4-8.   Additions, improvements, extensions, repairs or changes --
Apportioning costs.
(1) (a) Whenever the commission shall find that additions, extensions,
repairs, or improvements to or changes in the existing plant, equipment,
apparatus, facilities, or other physical property of any public utility or of
any two or more public utilities ought reasonably to be made, or that a new
structure or structures ought to be erected to promote the security or
convenience of its employees or the public or in any way to secure adequate
service or facilities, the commission shall make and serve an order directing
that such additions, extensions, repairs, improvements, or changes be made or
such structure or structures be erected in the manner and within the time
specified in the order.
(b) If any additions, extensions, repairs, improvements, or changes, or any
new structure or structures which the commission has ordered to be erected,
require joint action by two or more public utilities, the commission shall
notify the public utilities that the additions, extensions, repairs,
improvements, or changes, or new structure or structures have been ordered and
shall be made at their joint cost; whereupon the public utilities shall have
reasonable time as the commission may grant within which to agree upon the
portion or division of cost of the additions, extensions, repairs,
improvements, or changes or any new structure or structures which each shall
bear.
(2)  If at the expiration of the time in Subsection (1)(b) the public
utilities shall fail to file with the commission a statement that an agreement
has been made for division or apportionment of the cost or expense of the
additions, extensions, repairs, improvements, or changes, or of the new
structure or structures, the commission shall have authority, after further
hearing, to make an order fixing the proportion of the cost or expense to be
borne by each public utility and the manner in which the cost or expense shall
be paid or secured.
